District of Columbia statutes.
28-4526

Effect of judgment.

A final judgment or decree determining that a person has violated this chapter in an action brought by the District of Columbia under § 28-4522 or § 28-4524, other than a consent judgment or decree entered before any testimony at trial has been taken or entered pursuant to a plea of nolo contendere, shall be prima facie evidence against the person in any other action against the person under § 28-4525(b) and (c) as to all matters with respect to which the judgment or decree would be an estoppel between the parties to that judgment or decree.

History

Mar. 22, 1994, D.C. Law 10-89, § 2(b), 41 DCR 489

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-4526.